Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2404
Vehicle towed
away; lien and disposition; when.

A vehicle towed away under sections 60-2401
to 60-2411, which is not claimed by the owner within ninety days after towing,
is subject to lien and disposition under Chapter 52, article 6, by the person
who towed the vehicle.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 82, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 4.